North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-27.1 Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact
23-27.1-14.
Date of implementation of the interstate commission for emergency medical services personnel practice and associated rules, withdrawal, and amendment.

The compact becomes effective on the date on which the compact statute is enacted into law in the tenth member state. The provisions, which become effective at that time, are limited to the powers granted to the commission relating to assembly and the promulgation of rules. Thereafter, the commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking powers necessary to the implementation and administration of the compact.

Any state that joins the compact subsequent to the commission’s initial adoption of the rules is subject to the rules as they exist on the date on which the compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the commission has the full force and effect of law on the day the compact becomes law in that state.

Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same.

A member state’s withdrawal may not take effect until six months after enactment of the repealing statute.

Withdrawal may not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing state’s emergency medical services authority to comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting requirements of this act prior to the effective date of withdrawal.

Nothing contained in this compact may be construed to invalidate or prevent any emergency medical services personnel licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a nonmember state that does not conflict with the provisions of this compact.

This compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to this compact may become effective and binding upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all member states.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 211, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

23-27.1-15.
Construction and severability.

This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. If this compact is held to be contrary to the constitution of any state member thereto, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining member states. Nothing in this compact supersedes state law or rules related to licensure of emergency medical services agencies.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 211, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.